Maryland, session 2025, HB0802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–302 through 7–310 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–303 through 7–311, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–302.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0802*

HOUSE BILL 802
THE PURPLE PITCHERPLANT (SARRACENIA PURPUREA) IS THE STATE
CARNIVOROUS PLANT.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.